Hawaii statutes.
§1-20 "Month",
"year". The word "month" means a calendar month; and
the word "year", a calendar year. [CC 1859, §18; RL 1925, §17; RL
1935, §18; RL 1945, §17; RL 1955, §1-25; HRS §1-20]

Case Notes

Cited: 10 H. 249, 250; 38 H. 443, 444.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next